North Carolina, session 2025, SB346.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 90-96.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-96.2. Drug-related overdose treatment; limited immunity.
(a) As used in this section, "drug-related overdose" means an acute condition, including
mania, hysteria, extreme physical illness, coma, or death resulting from the consumption or use
of a controlled substance, or another substance with which a controlled substance was combined,
and that a layperson would reasonably believe to be a drug overdose that requires medical
assistance.
(b) Limited Immunity for Samaritan. – A person shall not be arrested, charged, or
prosecuted for any of the offenses listed in subsection (c3) of this section if all of the following
requirements and conditions are met:
(1) The person sought medical assistance or assisted in seeking medical assistance
for an individual experiencing a drug-related overdose by contacting the 911
system, campus security services, a law enforcement officer, or emergency
medical services personnel.
(2) The person acted in good faith when seeking medical assistance or when
assisting a person in seeking medical assistance, upon a reasonable belief that
he or she the person was the first to call for assistance.
(3) The person provided his or her own name to the 911 system or to a law
enforcement officer upon arrival.
(4) The person did not seek the medical assistance or assist in seeking the medical
assistance during the course of the execution of an arrest warrant, search
warrant, or other lawful search.
(5) The evidence for prosecution of the offenses listed in subsection (c3) of this
section was obtained as a result of the person seeking medical assistance or
assisting in seeking medical assistance for the drug-related overdose.
(c) Limited Immunity for Overdose Victim. – The immunity described in subsection (b)
of this section shall extend to the person who experienced the drug-related overdose overdose,
whether that person is the subject of another person's request for medical assistance or whether
that person requested medical assistance for himself or herself, if all of the requirements and
conditions listed in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), and (5) of subsection (b) of this section are satisfied.
*S346-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c1) Probation or Release. – A person shall not be subject to arrest or revocation of pretrial
release, probation, parole, or post-release if the arrest or revocation is based on an offense for
which the person is immune from prosecution under subsection (b) or (c) of this section. The
arrest of a person for an offense for which subsection (b) or (c) of this section may provide the
person with immunity will not itself be deemed to be a commission of a new criminal offense in
violation of a condition of the person's pretrial release, condition of probation, or condition of
parole or post-release.
(c2) Civil Liability for Arrest or Charges. – In addition to any other applicable immunity
or limitation on civil liability, a law enforcement officer who, acting in good faith, arrests or
charges a person who is thereafter determined to be entitled to immunity under this section shall
not be subject to civil liability for the arrest or filing of charges.
(c3) Covered Offenses. – A person shall have limited immunity from prosecution under
subsections (b) and (c) of this section for only the following offenses:
(1) A misdemeanor violation of G.S. 90-95(a)(3).
(2) A felony violation of G.S. 90-95(a)(3) for possession of less than one gram of
any controlled substance.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-123, s. 3, effective December 1, 2023, and
applicable to offenses committed on or after that date.
(4) A violation of G.S. 90-113.22.
(d) Construction. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:
(1) Bar the admissibility of any evidence obtained in connection with the
investigation and prosecution of (i) other crimes committed by a person who
otherwise qualifies for limited immunity under this section or (ii) any crimes
committed by a person who does not qualify for limited immunity under this
section.
(2) Limit any seizure of evidence or contraband otherwise permitted by law.
(3) Limit or abridge the authority of a law enforcement officer to detain or take
into custody a person in the course of an investigation of, or to effectuate an
arrest for, any offense other than an offense listed in subsection (c3) of this
section.
(4) Limit or abridge the authority of a probation officer to conduct drug testing of
persons on pretrial release, probation, or parole."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 18B-302.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18B-302.2. Medical treatment; limited immunity.
(a) Limited Immunity for Samaritan. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
person under the age of 21 shall not be arrested, charged, or prosecuted for a violation of
G.S. 18B-302 for the possession or consumption of alcoholic beverages if all of the following
requirements and conditions are met:
(1) The person sought medical assistance or assisted in seeking medical assistance
for an individual experiencing an alcohol-related overdose by contacting the
911 system, a law enforcement officer, campus security services, or
emergency medical services personnel.
(1a) The person acted in good faith when seeking medical or when assisting a
person in seeking medical assistance, upon a reasonable belief that he or she
the person was the first to call for assistance.
(2) The person provided his or her own name to the 911 system or to a law
enforcement officer upon arrival.
…
(4) The person did not seek the medical assistance or assist in seeking the medical
assistance during the course of the execution of an arrest warrant, search
warrant, or other lawful search.
Page 2 Senate Bill 346-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The evidence for prosecution of a violation of G.S. 18B-302 for the possession
or consumption of alcoholic beverages was obtained as a result of the person
seeking medical assistance or assisting in seeking medical assistance for the
alcohol-related overdose.
(b) Limited Immunity for Overdose Victim. – The immunity described in subsection (a)
of this section shall extend to the person who needed medical assistance assistance, whether that
person is the subject of another person's request for medical assistance or whether that person
requested medical assistance for himself or herself, if the requirements in subdivisions (1), (1a),
(4), and (5) of subsection (a) are satisfied.
(c) Probation or Release. – A person shall not be subject to arrest or revocation of pretrial
release, probation, parole, or post-release if the arrest or revocation is based on an offense for
which the person is immune from prosecution under subsection (a) or (b) of this section. The
arrest of a person for an offense for which subsection (a) or (b) of this section may provide the
person with immunity will not itself be deemed to be a commission of a new criminal offense in
violation of a condition of the person's pretrial release, condition of probation, or condition of
parole or post-release.
(d) Civil Liability for Arrest or Charges. – In addition to any other applicable immunity
or limitation on civil liability, a law enforcement officer who, acting in good faith, arrests or
charges a person who is thereafter determined to be entitled to immunity under this section shall
not be subject to civil liability for the arrest or filing of charges."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to acts or
omissions on or after that date.
Senate Bill 346-First Edition Page 3